Utah statutes.
31A-8a-210.   Rulemaking authority.

The commissioner has authority to adopt administrative rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act:

(1)  to enforce this chapter; and

(2)  as necessary to protect the public interest.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

